Hawaii statutes.
§352-13 Evaluation, counseling, training.
The director shall provide the opportunity for intelligence and aptitude
evaluation, psychological testing and counseling, prevocational and vocational
training, and employment counseling to all persons committed to the youth
correctional facilities. Counseling services shall be available for the
committed person's family including a reciprocal beneficiary, during the term
of commitment. [L 1980, c 303, pt of §8(1); am L 1997, c 383, §50]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next